Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 1 General Provisions

45-12-1.
Election.

The Governor shall be elected quadrennially in the manner provided by Article V of the Constitution of Georgia and shall be installed in office by the General Assembly. The General Assembly shall be the sole judge of his election and qualifications.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1243; Code 1868, § 1324; Code 1873, § 1298; Code 1882, § 1298; Civil Code 1895, § 81; Civil Code 1910, § 95; Code 1933, § 40-101; Ga. L. 1949, p. 948, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 201.

Law reviews.

For article reviewing the history of the Georgia legislature’s involvement in the selection of a Governor, see 22 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (1971).

45-12-2.
Inauguration.

The ceremony of inauguration shall take place during the first week of the first session of the General Assembly after the election and on such day of that week as the General Assembly, by joint resolution, shall appoint. If the General Assembly fails to appoint the day, the inauguration ceremony shall take place at 12:00 Noon on Saturday of that week unless prevented by providential cause. The Governor shall begin the discharge of his duties from the time of his inauguration.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 56; Code 1868, § 52; Code 1873, § 49; Code 1882, § 49; Civil Code 1895, § 116; Civil Code 1910, § 139; Code 1933, § 40-103; Ga. L. 1949, p. 948, § 2.

45-12-3.
Entry of inauguration upon House journal; evidence of Governor’s right, title, eligibility, and qualification.

The fact of such inauguration of the Governor shall be entered upon the journal of the House of Representatives and shall be conclusive evidence of his right and title to the office and of his eligibility and qualification.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 948, § 5.

45-12-4.
Oath of office.

The Governor-elect shall, before he enters on the duties of his office, take the following oath in the presence of the General Assembly in joint session of the Senate and House of Representatives:

“I do solemnly swear or affirm that I will faithfully execute the office of Governor of the State of Georgia and will, to the best of my ability, preserve, protect, and defend the Constitution thereof and the Constitution of the United States.”

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 57; Code 1868, § 53; Code 1873, § 50; Code 1882, § 50; Civil Code 1895, § 117; Civil Code 1910, § 140; Code 1933, § 40-104; Ga. L. 1949, p. 948, § 3; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1539, § 2.

Cross references.

Oath required, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. I, Para. VI.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1539, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is the intent of Section 2 of this Act to implement the provisions of Article V, Section I, Paragraph VI of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

45-12-5.
Seal.

There shall be a seal of the office of the Governor. The design shall be the same as that now used and shall not be altered except by authority of the General Assembly.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 79; Code 1868, § 73; Code 1873, § 78; Code 1882, § 78; Civil Code 1895, § 142; Civil Code 1910, § 165; Code 1933, § 40-106.

45-12-6.
Executive office; Governor’s residence.

The executive office of the Governor shall be in the capitol. If from any cause there is no capitol or if it is abandoned, then the executive office shall be at such place at the seat of government as the Governor may direct, and not elsewhere, unless made necessary by invasion, insurrection, pestilence, or rebellion. The Governor shall reside at the state capital during his term of office.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 80, 81; Code 1868, §§ 74, 75; Code 1873, § 79; Code 1882, § 79; Civil Code 1895, § 143; Civil Code 1910, § 166; Code 1933, § 40-107.

45-12-7.
Resignation; vacancy due to other causes; Lieutenant Governor to take oath; procedure.

The Governor shall transmit his resignation to the General Assembly, if it is in session; and, if it is not in session, he shall transmit it to the Secretary of State, who shall on the same day notify the Lieutenant Governor. If the office becomes vacant because of death or any other cause when the General Assembly is not in session, the Secretary of State shall inform the Lieutenant Governor. In either case, the Lieutenant Governor shall take the oath of office within ten days after having been informed by the Secretary of State. Such oath shall be taken before any Justice of the Supreme Court or judge of any superior court and also before the General Assembly, if it is in session. Such facts shall be entered upon the minutes of the office of the Governor. If the Lieutenant Governor fails to take the oath of office within the prescribed time, he shall be considered as having resigned. In such case, or if there is no Lieutenant Governor, the Secretary of State shall inform the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the proceedings shall be the same.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 132; Code 1868, § 127; Code 1873, § 136; Code 1882, § 136; Civil Code 1895, § 231; Civil Code 1910, § 266; Code 1933, § 40-108.

Cross references.

Vacating of office upon permanent physical or mental disability of holder of office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. IV.